Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.140.020

Financial responsibility of university—No state general fund obligation.

The governing body of a university financing facilities and equipment under this chapter shall give due regard to the costs of maintaining and operating such facilities and equipment during the useful lives of the facilities and equipment. No state appropriated funds may be used for (1) the payment of maintenance and operation of the facilities and equipment financed under this chapter; or (2) the grant or contract-supported research activities housed in these facilities. If funding through grants or contracts for research activities housed in these facilities is reduced, eliminated, or declared insufficient, the funding deficiencies are not a state obligation to be paid from the state general fund.

[ 2002 c 151 s 3.]